Utah statutes.
58-16a-301.    Licensure required -- License classifications.
(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of optometry, except as
specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-16a-305.
(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a
license in the classification of optometrist.
